New York, session 2025-2026, S514.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (w) to read as follows: 3 (w) (1) As used in this subsection, "hearing aid" shall have the same 4 meaning and definition used in section seven hundred eighty-nine of the 5 general business law. 6 (2) Every large group policy which provides major medical or compre- 7 hensive-type coverage shall include coverage for the cost of hearing 8 aids when the insured has not attained the age of twenty-seven and has 9 received a medical evaluation and such hearing aids are fitted and 10 dispensed by an audiologist registered as a hearing aid dispenser or a 11 registered hearing aid dispenser registered in accordance with article 12 thirty-seven-A of the general business law, provided an entity subject 13 to this subsection may limit the benefit payable under this subsection 14 to two thousand five hundred dollars per hearing aid for each hearing- 15 impaired ear every thirty-six months. 16 (3) This subsection does not prohibit an entity subject to the 17 provisions of this subsection from providing coverage that is greater or 18 more favorable to an insured or enrolled individual. 19 (4) An entity subject to the provisions of this subsection shall 20 provide coverage for the cost of hearing aids dispensed by an in-network EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01662-03-6 S. 514--A 2 1 audiologist registered as a hearing aid dispenser or a registered hear- 2 ing aid dispenser and shall not limit or deny coverage of the cost of a 3 hearing aid based on the style, brand, or circuit type of the hearing 4 aid. 5 § 2. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 6 subsection (yy) to read as follows: 7 (yy)(1) As used in this subsection, "hearing aid" shall have the same 8 meaning and definition used in section seven hundred eighty-nine of the 9 general business law. 10 (2) Every large group policy which provides medical, major medical or 11 comprehensive-type coverage shall include coverage for the cost of hear- 12 ing aids when the insured has not attained the age of twenty-seven and 13 has received a medical evaluation and such hearing aids are fitted and 14 dispensed by an audiologist registered as a hearing aid dispenser or a 15 registered hearing aid dispenser registered in accordance with article 16 thirty-seven-A of the general business law, provided an entity subject 17 to this subsection may limit the benefit payable under this subsection 18 to two thousand five hundred dollars per hearing aid for each hearing- 19 impaired ear every thirty-six months. 20 (3) This subsection does not prohibit an entity subject to the 21 provisions of this subsection from providing coverage that is greater or 22 more favorable to an insured or enrolled individual. 23 (4) An entity subject to the provisions of this subsection shall 24 provide coverage for the cost of hearing aids dispensed by any in-net- 25 work audiologist registered as a hearing aid dispenser or a registered 26 hearing aid dispenser and shall not limit or deny coverage of a hearing 27 aid based on the style, brand, or circuit type of the hearing aid. 28 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 29 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to all 30 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered, or amended on 31 or after such date. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 32 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 33 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 34 completed on or before such date.